Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 1 Conservators

29-5-1.
Conservator for adults; best interest of the adult; no presumption of need for conservator; objective of conservatorship.

The court may appoint a conservator for an adult only if the court finds the adult lacks sufficient capacity to make or communicate significant responsible decisions concerning the management of his or her property.

No conservator, except a conservator appointed under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 29-11-13 or a conservator for the estate of an individual who is missing or who is believed to be dead, shall be appointed for any adult except pursuant to the procedures of this chapter.

No conservator shall be appointed for an adult unless the appointment is in the best interest of the adult.

No conservator shall be appointed for an adult within two years after the denial or dismissal on the merits of a petition for the appointment of a conservator for that adult unless the petitioner shows a significant change in the condition or circumstances of the adult.

No adult shall be presumed to be in need of a conservator unless:

He or she has been adjudicated to be in need of a conservator pursuant to this chapter; or

The court has recognized another state’s determination of a protected person’s incapacity and the appointment of a conservator as provided in subsection (g) of Code Section 29-11-21.

An adult shall not be presumed to be in need of a conservator solely because of a finding of criminal insanity or incompetence to stand trial or a finding of a need for treatment or services pursuant to:

Code Section 37-1-1;

Code Sections 37-3-1 through 37-3-6;

Articles 2 through 6 of Chapter 3 of Title 37;

Code Sections 37-4-1 through 37-4-3 and 37-4-5 through 37-4-8;

Articles 2 through 5 of Chapter 4 of Title 37;

Code Section 37-5-3;

Code Sections 37-7-1, 37-7-2, and 37-7-4 through 37-7-7; and

Articles 2 through 6 of Chapter 7 of Title 37.

All conservatorships ordered pursuant to this chapter shall be designed to encourage the development of maximum self-reliance and independence in the adult and shall be ordered only to the extent necessitated by the adult’s actual and adaptive limitations after a determination that less restrictive alternatives to the conservatorship are not available or appropriate.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 13/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, inserted “a conservator appointed under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 29-11-13 or” in the middle of subsection (b) and substituted the present provisions of paragraph (e)(1) for the former provisions, which read: “No adult shall be presumed to be in need of a conservator unless adjudicated to be in need of a conservator pursuant to this chapter.”

Cross references.

Appointment of guardian ad litem for incompetent person not otherwise represented in an action, §

9-11-17

.

Domicile of persons of full age placed under power of guardian, §

19-2-5

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 325 (2012).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2017).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

29-5-2.
Qualifications of conservator of adult.

No person may be appointed or continue to serve as conservator of the estate of an adult who:

Is a minor, a ward, or a protected person;

Who has a conflict of interest with the adult unless the court determines that the conflict of interest is insubstantial or that the appointment clearly would be in the adult’s best interest; or

Is an owner, operator, or employee of a long-term care or other caregiving institution or facility at which the adult is receiving care, unless related to the adult by blood, marriage, or adoption.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-3.
Order of preference in selecting conservator; nomination of individual to serve as conservator; requirements of nomination.

The court shall appoint as conservator that person who shall best serve the interest of the adult taking into consideration the order of preferences set forth in this Code section. The court may disregard a person who has preference and appoint a person who has a lower preference or no preference; provided, however, that the court may disregard the preferences listed in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section only upon good cause shown.

Persons who are eligible and not disqualified have preference in the following order:

The person last nominated by the adult in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section;

The spouse of the adult or a person nominated by the adult’s spouse in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section;

An adult child of the adult or a person nominated by an adult child of the adult in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section;

A parent of the adult or a person nominated by a parent of the adult in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section;

A conservator appointed during the minority of the adult;

A conservator previously appointed in Georgia or another state;

A friend, relative, or any other person; or

The county guardian.

At any time prior to the appointment of a conservator, an adult may nominate in writing a person to serve as that adult’s conservator should the adult be judicially determined to be in need of a conservator, and that nomination shall be given the preference set forth in this Code section, provided that it is signed in accordance with the provisions of subsection (e) of this Code section or the provisions of Code Section 31-36-5.

At any time prior to the appointment of a conservator, a spouse, adult child, or parent of an adult may nominate in writing a person to serve as the adult’s conservator should the adult be judicially determined to be in need of a conservator, and that nomination shall be given the preference described in this Code section, provided that it is signed in accordance with the provisions of subsection (e) of this Code section or, if in a will, is executed in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 53-4-20.

A writing nominating the conservator of an adult:

Must contain an express nomination of the person who shall serve as conservator and must be signed or acknowledged by the individual making the nomination in the presence of two witnesses who sign in the individual’s presence; and

May be revoked by the individual by obliteration, cancellation, or by a subsequent inconsistent writing, whether or not witnessed.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 12/SB 534; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 31-36-5, referred to in subsection (c) of this Code section, was repealed by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 3, effective July 1, 2007.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 04.09.20.01.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For article, “Marriage, Death and Taxes:
The Estate Planning Impact of Windsor and Obergefell on Georgia’s Same Sex Spouses,” see 21 Ga. St. Bar. J. 9 (Oct. 2015).

29-5-4.
Affidavit on property or value of estate; payment, transfer, or delivery pursuant to affidavit.

Upon receiving an affidavit:

That the total personal property of an incapacitated adult does not exceed $2,500.00 in value;

That no conservator has been appointed for the incapacitated adult’s estate; and

That the affiant is the spouse or that there is no spouse and the affiant is a relative having the responsibility of the support of the incapacitated adult,

any person or corporation indebted to or holding personal property of the incapacitated adult shall be authorized to pay the amount of the indebtedness or deliver the personal property to the affiant. In the same manner and upon like proof, any person or corporation having the responsibility for the issuance or transfer of stocks, bonds, or other personal property shall be authorized to issue or transfer the stocks, bonds, or personal property to or in the name of the affiant. Upon payment, delivery, transfer, or issuance pursuant to the affidavit, the person or corporation shall be released to the same extent as if the payment, delivery, transfer, or issuance had been made to the legally qualified conservator of the incapacitated adult and shall not be required to see to the application or disposition of the personal property.

The person making the affidavit and receiving the personal property shall be authorized to expend or otherwise dispose of the personal property for the benefit of the incapacitated adult in the person’s judgment as may be just and proper.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.